Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5083HV (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2331 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.232 Attorney loan repayment 1 program ââ fund. 2 1. Program established. The college student aid commission 3 shall establish an attorney loan repayment program to encourage 4 attorneys to remain and practice law in this state. 5 2. Eligibility. An individual is eligible to apply to 6 enter into a program agreement with the college student aid 7 commission pursuant to subsection 3 if the individual meets all 8 of the following requirements: 9 a. Is a graduate of the college of law at the state 10 university of Iowa. 11 b. Is licensed to practice law in Iowa. 12 c. Is practicing law in Iowa at the time of application or 13 commits to begin practicing law in this state upon execution 14 of a program agreement. 15 3. Program agreements. An agreement shall be entered into 16 by an eligible attorney and the college student aid commission. 17 Under the agreement, to receive loan repayments pursuant to 18 subsection 5, an eligible attorney shall agree to and fulfill 19 all of the following requirements: 20 a. Remain and practice law in Iowa during each year for 21 which loan repayment assistance is received. 22 b. Provide not less than fifty hours per year of legal 23 services as an indigent defense attorney. 24 4. Priority. In awarding loan repayment assistance under 25 this section, the commission shall give priority to attorneys 26 who practice law in rural areas of the state. For purposes 27 of this section, ârural areaâ means a county or municipality 28 that has a population of less than twenty-six thousand and is 29 located more than twenty miles from a city with a population 30 of at least fifty thousand, based on the most recent federal 31 decennial census. 32 5. Loan repayment assistance. An eligible attorney 33 who enters into and remains in compliance with a program 34 agreement pursuant to subsection 3 shall receive loan repayment 35 -1- LSB 5083HV (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2331 assistance in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars per 1 year or the outstanding balance of the attorneyâs eligible 2 loans, whichever is less. Loan repayment assistance may be 3 provided for each year of eligible practice during a period 4 of not more than six consecutive years. The total amount of 5 loan repayment assistance an attorney may receive under the 6 program shall not exceed the total outstanding balance of the 7 attorneyâs eligible student loans at the time the program 8 agreement is executed. For purposes of this section, âeligible 9 loanâ means the attorneyâs total federally guaranteed Stafford 10 loan amount under the federal family education loan program 11 or the federal direct loan program, the attorneyâs federal 12 graduate plus loans, or the attorneyâs federal Perkins loan, 13 including principal and interest. 14 6. Fund established. An attorney loan repayment program 15 fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the 16 college student aid commission. The commission may accept 17 gifts, grants, bequests, and other private contributions, as 18 well as state or federal moneys, for deposit in the fund. All 19 moneys deposited in the fund are appropriated to the commission 20 to be used for purposes of this section. Notwithstanding 21 section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or 22 unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert 23 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 24 designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, 25 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 26 to the fund. 27 7. Rules. The college student aid commission shall adopt 28 rules to administer this section. 29 8. Limitation. The program shall not provide assistance for 30 more than one hundred ten attorneys in a single year. 31